California statutes. Water Code
(c) The secretary shall publish a notice of preparation of the preliminary election roll pursuant to Section 39057, indicating the date, time, and place of the board’s hearing to consider the preliminary election roll. The notice shall also provide information concerning the availability of the preliminary election roll.

(d) A copy of the preliminary election roll shall be available at the district’s offices during regular business hours and at any other convenient location, as determined by the district.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 275, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

41027.

(a) The board shall hold a public hearing to receive any testimony regarding the preliminary election roll. The hearing may be continued from time to time. Following the hearing and deliberations, the board shall make any changes to the preliminary election roll and shall adopt the election roll.

(b) If the preliminary election roll was prepared pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 41026, the adopted election roll shall be deemed the final election roll.

(c) If the preliminary election roll was prepared pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 41026, the secretary shall send the adopted election roll to the board of supervisors of the principal county. Upon receiving the adopted election roll, the board of supervisors of the principal county shall set the date, time, and place for a public hearing to receive any testimony regarding the adopted election roll. The board of supervisors shall publish a notice of its public hearing pursuant to Section 39057. At the hearing, the board of supervisors shall receive any testimony regarding the adopted election roll. The hearing may be continued from time to time. Following the hearing and deliberations, the board of supervisors shall either approve or disapprove the adopted election roll. If the board of supervisors approves the adopted election roll, it shall send the final election roll to the board. If the board of supervisors disapproves the adopted election roll, the board of supervisors shall notify the board of its disapproval and may recommend changes to the adopted election roll for the board to consider. The district shall compensate the principal county for any costs incurred by the board of supervisors pursuant to this chapter.

(d) The secretary shall certify and file the final election roll not later than the date of the first publication of the notice provided pursuant to Section 41308.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 683.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

41028.

The final election roll shall be used for all purposes relating to elections, until subsequently modified in accordance with the procedures set forth in this chapter, or until the board elects at least 84 days prior to a general election to use the most recent county assessment roll. The board may at any time cause a revised preliminary election roll to be prepared in accordance with Section 41026. Upon written petition filed by the holders of title to land with at least 10 percent of the votes based on the last finalized election roll, at least 150 days before any general or special election, the board shall prepare a new preliminary election roll and follow the procedures provided for in Section 41027. At least 84 days prior to an election, the district shall update the names listed as the holder of title to land of each parcel on the election roll and may rely on the most recent county assessment roll for determining ownership.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1593, Sec. 7.   Effective September 30, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Redivision and Establishing of Precincts [41150. - 41155.]

41150.

The board shall establish a convenient number of election precincts in the district and define the boundaries thereof. At least one precinct must be established for each division of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

41151.

The board may at any time, but not less than 60 days before an election to be held in the district, change the boundaries of any election precinct. The changes shall be entered upon the minutes of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

41153.

The redivision order of the board shall be filed in the office of the secretary and a copy certified by the secretary shall be filed with the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1020, Sec. 47.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

41154.

The board shall at its next regular meeting establish a convenient number of election precincts in each of the new divisions. No precinct shall include any land situate in more than one of the divisions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

41155.

The directors in office at the time new divisions are established shall continue in office for the divisions from which they were elected until the expiration of the terms for which they were elected, but their successors shall be elected from the new divisions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. General Elections [41300. - 41443.]



  ARTICLE 1. Preliminary Procedure and Nominations [41300. - 41308.]

41300.

An election, known as the general water storage district election, shall be held in each district on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in March in each odd-numbered year, at which a successor shall be chosen to each officer whose term expires in April next thereafter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 830.)
-------------------------------------------

41301.

Prior to the election, the board shall appoint for each precinct, from the voters thereof, one inspector and two judges, who constitute an election board for the precinct.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

41302.

Not less than 24 days before a general election, the secretary shall give notice of the election by causing a notice to be published once a week for three successive weeks in each affected county and by causing notices to be posted in the office of the board and in three public places in each election precinct stating the time of holding the election and the polling place of each precinct.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

41303.

Affidavits of the publication and posting of the election notices shall be filed with the county elections official of each affected county, together with a copy of the order calling the election, certified by the president, and duplicates shall be filed with the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 169.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

41304.

The board shall, by order made more than 24 days before the time for election, designate a convenient place within each precinct as the polling place of the precinct.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

41305.

Not less than 60 days before the election, any 10 or more voters in any division of the district may file with the board a petition requesting that the name of a specified person be placed on the ballot for the particular division as a candidate for the office of director to represent the particular division. Only the names proposed by the petitions filed with the board shall be printed on the ballots for the various divisions of the district. The date of actual receipt of any such petition by the board shall be deemed to be the date of filing of the same with the board. If there are less than 10 voters in any division, signatures of one-third of the number of voters, rounded up to the next whole number, shall be required to nominate a candidate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1593, Sec. 8.   Effective September 30, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

41306.

The petitions shall be preserved in the office of the secretary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

41307.

If, by the 59th day prior to the election, only one person has been nominated as provided in Section 41305 for any elective office to be filled at that election, or no one has been nominated for that office, the board, in its discretion and by resolution, may order that an election not be held for that office and request the board of supervisors to appoint to that office the person nominated or, where no one has been nominated for that office, to appoint to that office a person who the board of supervisors selects. Upon receipt of a request from the board, the board of supervisors shall make that appointment, and the person appointed shall qualify and take office and serve as if elected at a general election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 779, Sec. 10.   Effective October 10, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

41308.

Not less than 84 days before a general election, the secretary shall give notice of the provisions of Sections 41305 and 41307 by causing a notice to be published one time in each affected county stating the time of the forthcoming general election and reciting the provisions of Sections 41305 and 41307. The notice shall also state whether the most recent county assessment roll or an election roll prepared pursuant to Section 41027 shall be used for the election for purposes of establishing title to and value of land.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1593, Sec. 9.   Effective September 30, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Ballots [41330. - 41338.]

41330.

The ballots used at the election shall be provided by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

41331.

One of the judges of the election shall deliver to each of the voters one ballot for the votes to which the voter is entitled by this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1593, Sec. 10.   Effective September 30, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

41332.

Each ballot cast shall contain the number of votes it represents, which number shall be written or stamped upon it by an election officer and initialed by him when handed to the voter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

41333.

Each ballot shall have a perforated tab which shall be marked with the initials of a member of the board of election of the precinct immediately before being handed to the voter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

41334.

The perforated tab shall be torn from the ballot by the inspector immediately before the voted ballot is placed in the ballot-box, and shall be preserved by him and sent with the ballots to the secretary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

41335.

The ballots shall have printed on them the names of all candidates whose names have been filed as provided in this division, with a voting square to the right of each name. There shall be sufficient blank spaces left in which voters may write other names.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

41336.

The names shall be arranged in groups under the designation of the office for which each person named is a candidate, in order determined by random drawing following the procedures provided by the Elections Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1593, Sec. 11.   Effective September 30, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

41337.

The ballots in each division of the district shall contain names of persons to be voted for as director to represent that division only.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

41338.

No director shall be elected by the district at large, unless a court of competent jurisdiction has determined or hereinafter so determines.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1593, Sec. 12.   Effective September 30, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Conduct at Precincts [41360. - 41367.]

41360.

If the board fails to appoint an election board or the members appointed do not attend at the opening of the polls on the morning of election, the voters of the precinct present at that hour may appoint an election board, or supply the place of an absent member thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

41361.

The inspector is chairman of the election board. He may administer all oaths required in the process of an election and appoint judges if, during the progress of the election, any judge ceases to act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

41362.

Any member of the election board may administer and certify oaths required to be administered during the progress of an election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

41363.

Before opening the polls, each member of the election board must take and subscribe an oath to faithfully perform the duties imposed upon him by law. Any voter of the precinct may administer and certify such oath.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

41364.

Unless the board fixes other hours, the polls shall be opened at 6 a.m. on the morning of the election and closed at 7 p.m.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

41365.

The board may, in the notice of election, fix the hours for the opening and closing of the polls; but the polls shall be kept open for not less than six consecutive hours between the hours of 6 a.m. and 7 p.m.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

41366.

A list shall be kept by the election board containing the names of each voter who has voted and the number of votes cast by each. If the ballot is cast by proxy the list shall also state the name of the person casting it.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

41367.

Voting may commence as soon as the polls are opened, may continue during all the time the polls remain opened, and shall be conducted as nearly as practicable in accordance with the provisions of the Elections Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Returns of Election [41390. - 41395.]

41390.

The ballots shall be strung upon a cord or thread by the inspector during the counting in the order in which they are entered upon the tally list by the judges.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

41391.

As soon as all votes are counted a certificate shall be drawn upon each of the papers containing the poll lists and tallies, or attached thereto, stating in words and figures at full length the number of votes each one voted for has received, and designating the office to fill which he was voted for. Each certificate shall be signed by a judge and the inspector.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

41392.

One of the certificates, with the poll list and the tally paper to which it is attached, shall be retained by the inspector and preserved by him at least six months.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

41393.

The ballots, together with the other certificate with the poll list and tally paper to which it is attached, shall be:

(a) Sealed by the inspector in the presence of the judges and endorsed “Election returns of (naming the precinct) precinct.”

(b) Directed to the secretary.

(c) Immediately delivered by the inspector or some other responsible carrier designated by him, to the secretary.

(d) Kept by the secretary unopened for at least six months.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

41394.

If any voter of the district is of the opinion that the vote of any precinct has not been correctly counted, he may appear on the day appointed for the board to open and canvass the returns, and demand a recount of the vote of the precinct that is claimed to have been incorrectly counted.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

41395.

No list, tally paper, or certificate returned from any election shall be set aside or rejected for want of form if it can be satisfactorily understood.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Canvass [41415. - 41417.]

41415.

The board shall meet at its usual place of meeting on the first Monday after each election to canvass the returns.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

41416.

If at the time of meeting the returns from each precinct in the district in which the polls were opened have been received, the board shall then and there proceed to canvass the returns. If all the returns have not been received, the canvass shall be postponed from day to day until all the returns have been received, or until six postponements have been had.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

41417.

The canvass shall be made in public and by opening the returns and ascertaining the vote of the district for each person voted for, and declaring the result.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Results of Election [41440. - 41443.]

41440.

The person receiving the highest number of votes for each office to be filled at the election shall be elected.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

41441.

The board shall declare elected as director the person having the highest number of votes for that office in each division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

41442.

The secretary shall immediately make out and deliver to the elected persons certificates of election signed by him and authenticated with the seal of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

41443.

The secretary shall enter in the records of the board a statement of the result of the election as soon as it is declared. The statement shall show:

(a) The whole number of votes cast in the district, and in each division.

(b) The names of the persons voted for.

(c) The office to fill which each person was voted for.

(d) The number of votes cast in each precinct for each person voted for.

(e) The number of votes cast in each division for the office of director.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Special Elections [41550. - 41555.]

41550.

If a general election is not held as provided in this part, then upon the filing of a petition with the secretary, signed by the holders of title to more than 15 percent of the total assessed valuation of the land, or the holders of contracts to purchase such land executed by the holders of title thereto and qualified to vote in accordance with the provisions of Section 41006, requesting that a special election be called for the election of officers, the board shall thereupon call a special election for the election of officers. The election shall be held within not less than 15, nor more than 30, days after the filing of the petition.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

41551.

Notice of any special election to be held pursuant to the provisions of this division shall be given by posting notices in three public places in each election precinct in the district for at least 20 days, and also by publication of the notice once a week for three successive weeks in each affected county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

41552.

The notice shall specify the time, place, and purpose of the election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

41553.

If, by the ninth day prior to the special election, only one person has been nominated as provided in Section 41555, or no one has been nominated for the office, the board may order that an election not be held, following the same appointment procedures provided in Section 41307. If an election is to be held, unless otherwise in this division expressly specified, the election shall be held and the result determined and declared as nearly as may be in accordance with the provisions of this division relating to general elections.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1593, Sec. 13.   Effective September 30, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

41554.

No informalities in conducting the special election shall invalidate it, if otherwise fairly conducted.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

41555.

Not less than 10 days before the special election, any 10 or more voters in any division of the district may file with the board a petition requesting that the name of a specified person be placed on the ballot for the particular division as a candidate for the office of director to represent the particular division. Only the names proposed by the petitions filed with the board shall be printed on the ballots for the various divisions of the district. The date of actual receipt of any such petition by the board shall be deemed to be the date of filing of the same with the board. If there are less than 10 voters in any division, signatures of one-third of the number of voters, rounded up to the next whole number, shall be required to nominate a candidate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1593, Sec. 14.   Effective September 30, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Contest of Elections [41900. - 41905.]

41900.

Any election held under the provisions of this division may be contested by any holder of title to land liable to assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

41901.

The contest shall be brought in the superior court of any affected county and shall be conducted in the manner provided for contests of election by the Elections Code. In a contest not involving the right of a person declared elected to an office to hold the office, the directors shall be made parties to the contest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

41902.

The court shall determine upon the hearing whether the election was fairly conducted and in substantial compliance with the requirements of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

41903.

The contest shall be brought within 20 days after the declaration of the result.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

41904.

Either party of record has the right to appeal within 30 days from entry of judgment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

41905.

The appeal shall be heard and determined by the Supreme Court within 60 days from the time of the filing of the notice of appeal.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 5. DISTRICT PROJECT [42200. - 42752.]



  CHAPTER 1. The Project [42200. - 42297.]



  ARTICLE 1. Plans, Specifications, and Estimate of Costs [42200. - 42202.]

42200.

Upon the organization of a district, the board shall make or cause to be made all examinations, surveys, plans and specifications, and estimates of costs for the acquisition, appropriation, diversion, storage, conservation, and distribution of water, any drainage or reclamation works connected therewith, and the generation of hydroelectric energy incident thereto, and the sale and distribution thereof, as may be necessary or requisite to enable the board to ascertain and estimate the requirements and works necessary for the purpose of the district, and the probable cost and to make a report.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1086.)
-------------------------------------------

42201.

The board may use and adopt all previous estimates, surveys, reports, and other data it may have or acquire.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

42202.

The cost of the examinations, surveys, plans, specifications, and estimates is a part of the expense of the project. The board may issue warrants therefor, which shall be payable out of the funds of the district and may be included in any bond issue authorized for the purposes of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Units of Construction [42225. - 42227.]

42225.

The board may at any time and from time to time segregate and divide the plans, specifications, and estimates of cost into one or more units of construction, and may provide at that time that one or more individual units of construction shall not be entered upon immediately, but shall be authorized and undertaken in the order and at the time the board may thereafter determine.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1020, Sec. 48.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

42226.

In the event of the division of the project into units of construction, and the specification of one or more units for future construction, the board shall, when it determines upon the construction of any unit, pass a resolution to that effect.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1020, Sec. 49.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

42227.

Upon resolving to construct a unit, the board may amend the plans, specifications, and estimates of costs of the unit by making changes, modifications, and additions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1020, Sec. 50.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Acquisition of Property [42250. - 42252.]

42250.

If the board proposes to acquire property for the purposes or use of the district by purchase or lease, or in any manner other than by condemnation proceedings, that fact shall be stated in its report. A true copy of any instrument evidencing the proposed acquisition of the property or the right to acquire it shall be made a part of the report.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

42251.

Except where it is proposed to be acquired by eminent domain proceedings, no property belonging to any water corporation which is a public utility shall be acquired by a district, nor shall any property of such public utility be included in the report of the board unless and until the Public Utilities Commission has made its order authorizing the sale and any abandonment or curtailment of service by the public utility which would result from the acquisition by the district of property of the public utility.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

42252.

A certified copy of any order of authority made by the Public Utilities Commission shall be made a part of and filed with the report of the board. Unless the order of the Public Utilities Commission in effect finds and declares that the sale and abandonment or curtailment of service of the public utility through the acquisition of its properties by the district will be to the interest of the consumers of the public utility and that the terms and conditions of the acquisition of property of the public utility by the district are fair, just, and equitable to the consumers of the public utility, the report shall be insufficient for any of the purposes of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Filing the Report [42275. - 42280.]

42275.

Upon completion of the examination and study of the proposed project by the board, the board shall prepare and file a report with the secretary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1020, Sec. 51.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

42276.

The report shall set forth in detail all the following:

(a) The character and nature of the proposed works.

(b) A description of the rights both to water and land it will be necessary to acquire to complete the project.

(c) Plans and specifications.

(d) An estimate of the cost of the project, including the acquisition of all rights necessary to its completion and operation, and including any amounts proposed to be provided out of bond funds for the establishment of a bond reserve fund and for amounts proposed to be provided out of bond funds for the payment of interest on bonds during construction of the project.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1020, Sec. 52.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

42279.

If the board determines before preparing and filing its report to segregate and divide the plans, specifications, and estimates into more than one unit of construction, the plans, specifications, and estimates shall be complete as to each unit, and the board shall in its report specify the particular units the construction of which are to be immediately entered upon and the particular units reserved for future action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 454.)
-------------------------------------------

42280.

If the board of any district fails to complete and file its report within 10 years from the date of the filing of the order of the department declaring the district duly organized, the project of the district shall be deemed abandoned and the board shall within 90 days thereafter pay all outstanding debts and claims against the district and shall within that time remit to the assessment payers of the district in proportion to the amount paid by the assessment payers on the last call or assessment levied by the board the balance of any funds then remaining with the treasurer of the district or to its credit with the county treasurers of affected counties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1020, Sec. 55.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Improvement Districts [42290. - 42297.]

42290.

The board may by resolution determine that it is likely that the project or unit will benefit only a portion of the district. If the board so determines, the board shall provide for a hearing on the questions whether the project or unit will benefit only a portion of the district and whether an improvement district consisting of that portion should be established.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1020, Sec. 57.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

42291.

The board shall fix the time and place for any such hearing, and shall cause notice of such hearing, setting forth the purpose, time and place thereof, to be given by publication once a week for two successive weeks. Such publication shall be made in a newspaper of general circulation, printed and published in each affected county, and, if in any such county there is no such newspaper, in a newspaper printed and published in an adjoining county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 755.)
-------------------------------------------

42292.

At the time and place fixed for the hearing, or at any time and place to which the hearing is adjourned, the board shall proceed with the hearing. Any person interested, including any person owning land within the district, may appear at the hearing and present any matters material to the questions which are the subject of the hearing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 755.)
-------------------------------------------

42293.

At the conclusion of the hearing, the board shall by resolution determine whether the whole or only a portion of the district will be benefited by the project or unit. If the board determines that only a portion of the district will be benefited by the project or unit, the board may by resolution establish an improvement district consisting of that portion of the district. The resolution shall describe the territory within the improvement district in a manner sufficient for identification, and shall designate the improvement district by a distinctive name or number. In accordance with the resolution, said portion of the district shall thereupon constitute and be known as “____ Improvement District of ____ Water Storage District” or as “Improvement District No. ____ of ____ Water Storage District.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 755.)
-------------------------------------------

42294.

The determination of the board establishing an improvement district shall be final and conclusive.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 755.)
-------------------------------------------

42295.

After the establishment of an improvement district within a district pursuant to this article:

(a) All proceedings with respect to the project or unit for which the improvement district was established shall apply only to the improvement district.

(b) Any election with respect to such project or unit or bonds therefor or warrants relating thereto, held pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 42300) of this part, Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 42500) of this part, Part 7 (commencing with Section 44400) of this division or Part 8 (commencing with Section 45100) of this division, shall be held only within the improvement district. 

(c) Any assessment with respect to such project or unit shall be levied only upon the land within the improvement district.

(d) Any bonds or warrants issued with respect to such project or unit shall be bonds or warrants of the improvement district, secured by an assessment levied upon the land within the improvement district only, and that fact shall be indicated on the face of each such bond or warrant.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 755.)
-------------------------------------------

42296.

An improvement district shall be governed, and its business shall be conducted, by the board and officers of the district in the name of the improvement district. An improvement district shall not have its own officers or employees. The board and each of the officers of the district, respectively, shall have all the rights, powers and privileges as to an improvement district, its land and the proceedings in relation to the improvement district that each respectively has as to the district of which the improvement district is a part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1966, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 56.)
-------------------------------------------

42297.

All of the provisions of this part, except Section 42280, all of the provisions of Part 6 (commencing with Section 43000) of this division, all of the provisions of Part 7 (commencing with Section 44400) of this division, all of the provisions of Part 8 (commencing with Section 45100) of this division, all of the provisions of Part 9 (commencing with Section 46000) of this division, and all of the provisions of Part 10 (commencing with Section 48000) of this division except Chapter 2.6 (commencing with Section 48350) shall apply to an improvement district in the same manner as they apply to the district which includes the improvement district and as though the term “improvement district” were used in place of the word “district” at each place where said word appears in any of said provisions except when said word is used as a part of the term “other district” and the improvement district and the board and officers of the district shall have all of the powers, with respect to the improvement district, that are stated in said provisions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1966, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 56.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Recommendation of Abandonment of Project [42301. - 42361.]



  ARTICLE 1. Investigation by the Board [42301. - 42301.]

42301.

If the board recommends that the project be abandoned, the board may call a special election to be held in the district for the purpose of determining whether the recommendation of the board shall be adopted or rejected.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1020, Sec. 59.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Election [42325. - 42332.]

42325.

If a special election is called by the board pursuant to Article 1 of this chapter, the board shall within 30 days after calling the election give notice of the election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1607.)
-------------------------------------------

42326.

The notice shall be published once a week for at least three weeks previous to the election in each affected county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

42328.

For the purposes of the special election, the board shall establish a convenient number of election precincts and define their boundaries.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1607.)
-------------------------------------------

42329.

At the time of calling the election, the board shall in its order designate voting places and appoint three landholders of the district to act as a board of election at each voting place.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1607.)
-------------------------------------------

42330.

The election shall be conducted as nearly as practicable in accordance with the provisions of this division relating to general elections, but no particular form of ballot shall be required.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

42331.

The qualifications of voters at the election shall be the same as prescribed for the formation election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

42332.

The votes cast at the election shall be canvassed by the board in the same manner as votes cast at the formation election, and the result of the special election shall be declared and entered of record in the minutes of the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1607.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Proceedings After Election [42355. - 42361.]

42355.

If the canvass of the votes cast at the special election shows more than one-half of all votes cast are “Completion of project—Yes” and also shows that more than one-half of the qualified voters who voted at the election voted “Completion of project—Yes” the board shall appoint the commissioners provided for in Article 1 (commencing with Section 46150) of Chapter 2 of Part 9 of this division and thereafter proceedings shall be taken and followed as are provided in this division for assessments and completion of projects.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1020, Sec. 59.1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

42356.
